ro-RO: Tip de montare a woofer-ului: Incintă band-pass; Free-air / panou infinit; Incintă bass-reflex; Incintă închisă; Înlocuitor OEM specific vehiculului; Altele
it: Tipo di montaggio del woofer: Cassa passa-banda; Aria libera / baffle infinito; Cassa reflex; Cassa chiusa; Ricambio OEM specifico per veicolo; Altro
zh-CN: 低音扬声器安装类型: 带通箱; 自由空气/无限障板; 倒相箱; 密闭箱; 特定车型 OEM 替换件; 其他
zh-TW: 低音揚聲器安裝類型: 帶通式音箱; 自由空間 / 無限障板; 開孔式音箱; 密閉式音箱; 車型專用原廠替換件; 其他
en: Woofer mounting type: Band-pass enclosure; Free-air / infinite baffle; Ported enclosure; Sealed enclosure; Vehicle-specific OEM replacement; Other
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt loa trầm: Thùng loa band-pass; Không không hở / vách ngăn vô cực; Thùng loa có lỗ thông hơi; Thùng loa kín; Thay thế OEM chuyên dụng cho xe; Khác
ko: 우퍼 장착 유형: 대역 통과 인클로저; 프리 에어 / 무한 배플; 포트형 인클로저; 밀폐형 인클로저; 차량 맞춤형 OEM 교체품; 기타
de: Anbringungsart des Subwoofers: Bandpassgehäuse; Free-Air / offene Schallwand; Bassreflexgehäuse; Geschlossenes Gehäuse; Fahrzeugspezifischer OEM-Ersatz; Sonstige
el: Τύπος στερέωσης woofer: Καμπίνα band-pass; Free-air / infinite baffle; Καμπίνα με οπή; Κλειστή καμπίνα; Ανταλλακτικό OEM ειδικά για οχήματα; Άλλο
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งวูฟเฟอร์: ตู้แบนด์พาส; ฟรีแอร์ / อินฟินิตแบฟเฟิล; ตู้เปิด; ตู้ปิด; อะไหล่ OEM เฉพาะรุ่นรถ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ montáže basového reproduktora: Skrinka typu band-pass; Free-air/nekonečná ozvučnica; Skrinka s bassreflexom; Uzavretá skrinka; OEM náhrada pre konkrétne vozidlo; Iné
nb: Monteringstype for woofer: Båndpasskasse; Free-air / uendelig baffel; Portet kasse; Lukket kasse; Kjøretøyspesifikk OEM-erstatning; Annet
es: Tipo de montaje del woofer: Caja de paso de banda; Aire libre / bafle infinito; Caja con puerto; Caja sellada; Reemplazo de equipo original específico para el vehículo; Otro
ja: ウーファーマウントタイプ: バンドパスエンクロージャー; フリーエア / インフィニットバッフル; ポートエンクロージャー; シールドエンクロージャー; 車種専用 OEM 交換品; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do woofer: Caixa passa-banda; Ar livre/baffle infinito; Caixa ventilada; Caixa selada; Substituição OEM específica para veículo; Outro
nl: Type woofermontage: Bandpassbehuizing; Free-air/infinite baffle; Gepoorte behuizing; Gesloten behuizing; Voertuigspecifieke OEM-vervanging; Overig
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на субуфер: Бендпас кутия; Свободен обем (Free-air) / безкраен екран; Отворена кутия (с порт); Затворена кутия; OEM заместител за конкретно превозно средство; Друго
sv: Typ av montering för bashögtalare: Bandpasslåda; Free-air/oändlig baffel; Portad låda; Sluten låda; Fordonsspecifik OEM-ersättning; Övrigt
da: Monteringstype for woofer: Båndpaskabinet; Free-air/uendelig baffel; Basreflekskabinet; Lukket kabinet; Køretøjsspecifik OEM-erstatning; Andet
fr: Type de fixation du haut-parleur de graves: Enceinte passe-bande; Baffle plan / air libre; Enceinte bass-reflex; Enceinte close; Pièce de rechange d’origine spécifique au véhicule; Autre
pl: Typ montażu woofera: Obudowa pasmowo-przepustowa; Free-air / odgroda nieskończona; Obudowa bass-reflex; Obudowa zamknięta; Dedykowany zamiennik OEM; Inne
ru: Тип крепления вуфера: Корпус бандпасс; Установка Free-air / бесконечный экран; Фазоинверторный корпус; Закрытый корпус; Штатная замена (OEM) для конкретного автомобиля; Другое
hu: Mélynyomó rögzítési típusa: Sáváteresztő láda; Free-air / végtelen hangfal; Basszreflex láda; Zárt láda; Járműspecifikus OEM-csere; Egyéb
lt-LT: Žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbių tvirtinimo tipas: Daugiakameris („Band-pass“) korpusas; Atvirojo tūrio („Free-air“) / begalinio ekrano; Korpusas su fazoinvertoriumi; Uždaras korpusas; Konkrečiai transporto priemonei skirtas OEM pakaitalas; Kita
tr: Woofer montaj tipi: Band-pass kabin; Serbest hava / sonsuz saptırıcı; Portlu kabin; Kapalı kabin; Araca özel OEM yedeği; Diğer
cs: Typ uchycení basového reproduktoru: Pásmová ozvučnice; Free-air / nekonečná ozvučnice; Basreflexová ozvučnice; Uzavřená ozvučnice; OEM náhrada pro konkrétní vozidlo; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do alto-falante: Caixa band-pass; Baffle infinito/free-air; Caixa dutada; Caixa selada; Reposição OEM específica para o veículo; Outros
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže zvučnika (woofera): Band-pass kutija; Slobodni zrak / beskonačna pregrada; Bass-reflex kutija; Zatvorena kutija; OEM zamjena specifična za vozilo; Ostalo
fi: Kaiuttimen asennustyyppi: Kaistanpäästökotelo; Free-air / infinite baffle; Refleksikotelo; Suljettu kotelo; Ajoneuvokohtainen OEM-vaihto; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže nizkotonskega zvočnika: Ohišje band-pass; Ohišje free-air / infinite baffle; Ohišje z bas refleksom; Zaprto ohišje; Namenska OEM-zamenjava za vozila; Drugo